Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 203 Incompetency Proceedings [Repealed]

203.005.
Changes of terms and definitions in chapter. [Repealed.]

203.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

203.012.
Petition of determination of competency — Contents. [Repealed.]

203.014.
Proceedings deemed mental inquest — Counsel for parties. [Repealed.]

203.015.
Examining physician — Psychologist — Qualifications — Certificate — Contents. [Repealed.]

203.016.
Defendant, how notified — Notice to others — Failure to appear, contempt. [Repealed.]

203.018.
Presence of defendant required — Exception. [Repealed.]

203.020.
Voluntary admission to hospital — Release — Inquest — Procedure. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.022.
Hearing — Jury — Oath. [Repealed.]

203.024.
Procedure for restoration of competent person — Jury trial — Order. [Repealed.]

203.025.
Admission of mental patient on temporary basis — Release unless properly committed. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.026.
Copy of judgment to be filed in office of county clerk — Effect of failure. [Repealed.]

203.030.
Admission on application of health officer — Restraint — Removal — Inquest. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.032.
Committee for incompetent appointed, when. [Repealed.]

203.040.
Admission of residents adjudged mentally ill or defective by other states — Inquests. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.045.
Certificate or affidavit as evidence — No fee to be charged. [Renumbered.]

203.050.
Voluntary admission of drug addict. [Repealed.]

203.060.
Payment for voluntary admission — When inquest needed. [Repealed.]

203.070.
Board of patients to be paid in advance — Refunds. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.080.
Patient’s estate liable for his board — Rights against relatives. [Repealed.]

203.090.
Support of private patients — Rates of charge. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.100.
Recovery for support of patients. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.110.
Employment of attorney — Cost of litigation — Limitation of action. [Renumbered.]

203.120.
Information furnished to department. [Repealed.]

203.130.
Admissions of residents for compensation. [Repealed.]

203.140.
Rates for pay patients — Bond — Removal to private institutions. [Repealed.]

203.150.
Pay patients from other states not to crowd institutions. [Repealed.]

203.155.
Extradition of nonresident patient. [Renumbered.]

203.160.
Return of nonresidents — Expenses. [Renumbered.]

203.170.
Drug addicts — Maintenance — Rules — Release. [Repealed.]

203.180.
Transfer of patients between hospitals. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.185.
Transfer of patient to United States public health service or other agency. [Renumbered and Repealed.]

203.190.
Training school and farm colony for mentally retarded. [Repealed.]

203.200.
Epileptics may be segregated. [Repealed.]

203.210.
Objects and purposes of institutions for mentally ill or defective. [Repealed.]

203.220.
Care, custody and training — Production by inmates. [Renumbered.]

203.230.
Minimum age for feeble-minded and epileptic inmates. [Repealed.]

203.240.
Records to be kept. [Repealed.]

203.250.
Allowance for pauper mentally retarded. [Repealed.]

203.260.
Conditions of allowance — Age and condition of pauper. [Repealed.]

203.270.
Court clerks to certify inquests to Department of Finance. [Repealed.]

203.280.
Inquest to be held every fifth year. [Repealed.]

203.290.
Circuit clerk to furnish list of pauper mental defectives annually. [Repealed.]

203.300.
Bringing mental patient into state and fraudulent adjudication of status prohibited. [Repealed.]

203.310.
Training school for psychiatric nursing — Course of study. [Repealed.]

203.320.
Qualifications for students — Grade — Graduation. [Repealed.]

203.330.
Supervisors of training schools — Novitiate attendants — Salaries. [Repealed.]

203.340.
Mental examination of habitual criminals. [Renumbered.]

203.410.
Cities or counties may join in providing mental health program. [Renumbered.]

203.420.
Community mental health board, establishment, members. [Renumbered.]

203.430.
Terms of members of board — Vacancies — Removal. [Renumbered.]

203.440.
Duties of board. [Renumbered.]

203.450.
State aid for establishment of regional mental health programs. [Renumbered.]

203.460.
Limits on state grants — Purposes for which made. [Renumbered.]

203.470.
Plan and budget to be submitted to obtain state aid. [Renumbered.]

203.480.
Allocation of state funds — Funds withdrawn, when. [Renumbered.]

203.490.
Powers and duties of state commissioner as to regional programs. [Renumbered.]

203.500.
Cities and counties may appropriate funds and levy tax for regional program. [Renumbered.]

203.505.
Counsel in restoration proceeding — Fee. [Repealed.]

203.510.
Appeal to circuit court. [Repealed.]

203.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

203.995.
Penalties. [Repealed.]